Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Enforcement.

Sec. 08.18.116.
Investigations.

Either the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may investigate alleged or apparent violations of this chapter relating to contractors. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may investigate alleged or apparent violations of this chapter relating to home inspection activities. These departments, upon showing proper credentials, may enter, during regular hours of work, a construction site where it appears that contracting work is being done. The departments may make inquiries about the identity of the contractor or the person acting in the capacity of a contractor. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may make inquiries about the identity of a home inspector or a person acting in the capacity of a home inspector. Upon demand, a contractor or home inspector or person acting in the capacity of a contractor or home inspector, or that person’s representative, shall produce evidence of current endorsement, if applicable, and registration.

If an owner files a notice of the advertisement of a structure for sale or the sale of a structure during the period of construction or for two years after the period of construction begins under AS

08.18.161

(11), the department shall investigate and take appropriate action under this chapter if the notice and circumstances indicate that the owner is operating a business for which the owner is required to register as a contractor under this chapter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 20 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 10 ch 59 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999 and “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of subsection (b), see sec. 12(c), ch. 59, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, added (b).

Sec. 08.18.117.
Issuance of citations.

Except as provided in AS

08.18.125

, either the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may issue a citation for a violation if there is probable cause to believe a person has violated this chapter with respect to contractor activities. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may issue a citation for a violation if there is probable cause to believe a person has violated this chapter with respect to home inspection activities. Each day a violation continues after a citation for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 21 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999 and “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 08.18.118.
Procedure and form of citation issuance and procedure.

A citation issued under this chapter must comply with AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

. A person receiving the citation is not required to sign a notice to appear in court.

The time specified in the notice to appear on a citation issued under this chapter must be at least five working days after the issuance of the citation.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development are responsible for the issuance of books containing appropriate citations, and each shall maintain a record of each book issued and each citation contained in it. Each department shall require and retain a receipt for every book issued to an employee of that department.

The department that issues a citation under this chapter shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. Upon its deposit with the court, the citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other official action taken by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor. The department that issued the citation may not dispose of it or copies of it or of the record of its issuance except as required under this subsection and (e) of this section.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall require the return of a copy of every citation issued by the respective department under this chapter and of all copies of every citation that has been spoiled or upon which an entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator. The departments shall also maintain, in connection with every citation issued by the respective department, a record of the disposition of the charge by the court where the original or copy of the citation was deposited.

A citation issued under this chapter is considered to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.

History.

(§ 5 ch 83 SLA 1985; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) and (e) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999 and “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) and (e) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (b), and (f) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 08.18.119.
Failure to obey citation.

Unless the citation has been voided or otherwise dismissed by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor, a person who without lawful justification or excuse fails to appear in court to answer a citation issued under this chapter, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 5 ch 83 SLA 1985)

Sec. 08.18.121.
Suspension and revocation of registration.

If the insurance required in AS

08.18.101

ceases to be in effect, the registration of the contractor or home inspector shall be suspended until the insurance has been reinstated.

If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the bond or depletes the cash deposit so that there is not in effect a bond undertaking or cash deposit in the full amount prescribed in AS

08.18.071

, the registration of the contractor or home inspector involved shall be suspended until the bond liability in the required amount, unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims, has been furnished.

If a bonding company cancels its bond of a contractor or home inspector, the contractor’s or home inspector’s registration shall be revoked. The contractor or home inspector may again obtain registration by complying with the requirements of this chapter.

If a registered contractor or registered home inspector fails to fulfill the contractor’s or home inspector’s obligations as set out in AS

08.18.071

, the contractor’s or home inspector’s registration shall be suspended for a period of time the commissioner determines is appropriate. After three suspensions, the contractor’s or home inspector’s registration may be permanently revoked.

Proceedings to suspend or revoke a registration issued under this chapter are governed by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

If the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development determines that a contractor or person acting in the capacity of a contractor is in violation of this chapter, that department may give written notice to the person prohibiting further action by the person as a contractor. If the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development determines that a home inspector or a person acting in the capacity of a home inspector is in violation of this chapter, the department may give written notice to the person prohibiting further action by the person as a home inspector. The prohibition in a notice given under this subsection continues until the person has submitted evidence acceptable to the appropriate department showing that the violation has been corrected.

A person affected by an order issued under this chapter may seek equitable relief preventing the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from enforcing the order.

The endorsement of a residential contractor is automatically suspended or revoked while the contractor’s registration is suspended or revoked.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1971; am §§ 6, 7 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 99 SLA 1990; am §§ 22 — 26 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (f) and (g) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999 and “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (f) and (g) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.123.
Denial, suspension, and revocation of endorsement or home inspector registration.

The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to grant or renew a residential contractor endorsement, a home inspector registration, or an associate home inspector registration upon a finding that

the application is fraudulent or misleading;

the endorsement holder or registrant has knowingly violated this chapter or a lawful order or regulation of the department;

the endorsement holder or registrant is incompetent or has engaged in fraudulent practices.

Proceedings for the denial, suspension, or revocation of residential contractor endorsement, home inspector registration, or associate home inspector registration are governed by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 7 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 27 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.18.125.
Administrative fine and procedure.

Notwithstanding any other remedy available under this chapter and except as provided in (e) of this section, the department may impose an administrative fine of not more than $1,000 for the first violation and not more than $1,500 for a second or subsequent violation of either AS

08.18.011

or

08.18.025

.

The department shall issue a written notice of an administrative fine imposed under (a) of this section, together with a statement of the reason for the fine, a copy of the applicable procedures, and notice of an opportunity to request a hearing, including the contact information for making the request, within 30 days after the date of the notice of the fine.

If a person who is issued a notice of an administrative fine under (b) of this section fails to request a hearing within 30 days after the date of the notice, the right to a hearing is waived, and the administrative fine is not subject to judicial review. A hearing request must be in writing and must clearly state the issues to be raised at the hearing. The department shall schedule a hearing before a hearing officer not earlier than 10 days after receiving the request for a hearing.

A decision of a hearing officer under this section is a final administrative decision subject to review by a superior court under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The department may not impose an administrative fine on a person who is acting as a contractor or home inspector in an area with a population of 1,000 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks.

History.

(§ 2 ch 9 SLA 2006)

Sec. 08.18.130.
Requirement for license. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.131.
Injunction; civil penalty.

In an action instituted in the superior court by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the court may enjoin a person from acting in the capacity of a contractor in violation of this chapter. In an action instituted in the superior court by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, the court may enjoin a person from acting in the capacity of a home inspector in violation of this chapter. In addition to other relief, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. Each day that an unlawful act continues constitutes a separate violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1971; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 28 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999 and “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7(a), ch. 9, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of this section applies “to a violation occurring on or after June 21, 2006.”

Sec. 08.18.140.
Persons exempt from written examination. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.141.
Violations.

A contractor, a home inspector, or a person acting in the capacity of a contractor or home inspector is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person

knowingly violates AS

08.18.011

or

08.18.025

; and

has been previously

convicted of violating AS

08.18.011

or

08.18.025

;

found guilty of a violation under AS

08.18.117

if the violation involved AS 08.18.011 or 08.18.025; or

fined under AS

08.18.125

.

A contractor, a home inspector, or a person acting in the capacity of a contractor or home inspector who violates a provision of this chapter, other than a violation under (a) of this section, is guilty of a violation punishable under AS 12.

Criminal prosecution for a violation of this chapter does not preclude the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from seeking available civil or administrative remedies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 9 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 29 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 2006)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999 and “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. -—

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.18.150.
Application. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.151.
Legal actions by contractor or home inspector.

A person acting in the capacity of a contractor or home inspector may not bring an action in a court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of work or for breach of a contract for which registration is required under this chapter without alleging and proving that the contractor or home inspector was a registered contractor or registered home inspector, as applicable, at the time of contracting for the performance of the work.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 30 ch 134 SLA 2003)